Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1098.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 325.5 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
No volunteer or rural firefighter shall be required to attend
any state or county mandatory training.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.







ENGR. H. B. NO. 1098 Page 1

Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ____ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 1098 Page 2